Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4052.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "nondisclosure agreement act". Sec. 2. (1) Beginning on and after the effective date of this act, a member of the legislature or that member's legislative staff shall not enter into a nondisclosure agreement regarding any work done in that member's legislative capacity. (2) A nondisclosure agreement entered into in violation of this act is void. Sec. 3. This act applies to any nondisclosure agreement that is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01306'25) or House Bill No. 4053 (request no. H01306'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.